Vermont, session 2025-2026, S106.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PSYCHEDELIC THERAPY ADVISORY WORKING GROUP;
STUDY
(a) Findings.
(1) In 2024, the General assembly enacted Act and Resolves No. 126,
“An act relating to the establishment of the Psychedelic Therapy Advisory
Working Group,” for the purpose of reviewing existing research on the cost-
benefit profile of the use of psychedelics to improve mental health and to make
findings and recommendations regarding the advisability of the establishment
VT LEG #380821 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.106
2025 Page 2 of 5
of a State program to permit health care providers to administer psychedelics
in a therapeutic setting and the impact on public health of allowing individuals
to legally access psychedelics under State law.
(2) On November 12, 2024, the Working Group issued its report
recommending the “[extension] of the current [W]orking [G]roup with the
expansion of participants to monitor the evolution of research and programs
across the country and to facilitate the ability to research psychedelic therapies
in Vermont.” The Working Group also found that “[a]lthough not the only
promising area of application supported by existing science, the [G]roup
demonstrated general consensus regarding the potential for psilocybin-assisted
therapy for depression and anxiety in the context of serious illness & end-of-
life care.”
(b) Creation. There is created the Psychedelic Therapy Advisory Working
Group for the purpose of reviewing existing research on the cost-benefit profile
of the use of psychedelics to improve mental health and to make findings and
recommendations regarding the advisability of the establishment of a State
program to permit health care providers to administer psychedelics in a
therapeutic setting and the impact on public health of allowing individuals to
legally access psychedelics under State law.
(c) Membership. The Working Group shall be composed of the following
members:
VT LEG #380821 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.106
2025 Page 3 of 5
(1) the Dean of the Larner College of Medicine at the University of
Vermont or designee;
(2) the President of the Vermont Psychological Association or designee;
(3) the Executive Director of the Vermont Board of Medical Practice or
designee;
(4) the Director of the Vermont Office of Professional Regulation or
designee;
(5) the Executive Director of the Vermont Medical Society or designee;
(6) the Vermont Commissioner of Health or designee;
(7) the Vermont Commissioner of Mental Health or designee;
(8) an expert in psychedelic treatment of mental conditions who is
affiliated with a Vermont hospital currently providing ketamine therapy
appointed by the Vermont Commissioner of Mental Health;
(9) a mental health professional with specialized training in psychedelic
medicine or research appointed by the Commissioner of Health;
(10) an attorney with experience in health care appointed by the
Commissioner of Health; and
(11) a member of the public appointed by the Commissioner of Health.
(d) Powers and duties.
(1) The Working Group shall:
VT LEG #380821 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.106
2025 Page 4 of 5
(A) continue to review the latest research and evidence of the public
health benefits and risks of clinical psychedelic assisted treatments;
(B) continue to monitor the laws and programs of other states that
have authorized the use of psychedelics by health care providers in a
therapeutic setting and the necessary components and resources if Vermont
were to pursue such a program;
(C) consider how Vermont can develop and fund harm reduction
training and education for health practitioners and the public regarding the use
of psilocybin and other psychedelics; and
(D) propose a pilot project for the use of psilocybin-assisted therapies
in persons with serious illnesses and end-of-life care.
(2) The Working Group shall seek testimony from nationally recognized
research institutions that have conducted and are conducting research in
psychedelics.
(e) Assistance. The Working Group shall have the assistance of the
Vermont Department of Mental Health, in collaboration with the Vermont
Psychological Association, for purposes of scheduling and staffing meetings
and developing and submitting the report required by subsection (f) of this
section.
(f) Report. On or before November 15, 2025, the Working Group shall
submit a written report to the House and Senate Committees on Judiciary, the
VT LEG #380821 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.106
2025 Page 5 of 5
House Committees on Health Care and on Human Services, and the Senate
Committee on Health and Welfare with its findings and any recommendations
for legislative action.
(g) Meetings.
(1) The Vermont Department of Mental Health shall call the first
meeting of the Working Group to occur on or before July 15, 2025.
(2) The Working Group shall select a chair from among its members at
the first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Working Group shall cease to exist on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380821 v.1